Massachusetts, session 194th, H4955.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (a) of section 11 of chapter 176J of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the
following:-
The commissioner may also exempt carriers from complying with this section based on
(i) whether the majority of a carrier’s chapter 176J membership is enrolled in a single rate
region; or (ii) whether the majority of the carrier’s chapter 176J membership is enrolled in
subsidized coverage offered under chapter 176Q through which such members receive state or
federal subsidies; or (iii) whether the carrier receives 80 per cent or more of its income from
government programs, including subsidized coverage offered under chapter 176Q through which
such members receive state or federal subsidies.
SECTION 2. Section 9A of chapter 176O, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
of 2

"(a)(i) limits the ability of the carrier to introduce or modify a select network plan or
tiered network plan by granting the health care provider a guaranteed right of participation; (ii)
requires the carrier to place all members of a provider group, whether local practice groups or
facilities, in the same tier of a tiered network plan; or (iii) requires the carrier to include all
members of a provider group, whether local practice groups or facilities, in a select network plan
on an all-or-nothing basis; or"
of 2